test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-i_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - kyeli:
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom:   kyeli
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen:   kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill:   kuálán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc:   kyeleest
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com:   kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Sg+Abe:   kyelettáá
    kyeli+N+Ess:      kyellin
    kyeli+N+Pl+Nom:   kyeleh
    kyeli+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuolij, kuolij]
    kyeli+N+Pl+Acc:   kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Ill:   kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Loc:   kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Pl+Com:   kuolijguin
    kyeli+N+Pl+Abe:   kuolijttáá

  Noun - printti:
    printti+N+Sg+Nom:   printti
    printti+N+Sg+Gen:   priinti
    printti+N+Sg+Ill:   priintân
    printti+N+Sg+Loc:   priintist
    printti+N+Sg+Com:   printtijn
    printti+N+Sg+Abe:   printittáá
    printti+N+Ess:      printtin
    printti+N+Pl+Nom:   priintih
    printti+N+Pl+Gen:  [priintij, printij]
    printti+N+Pl+Acc:   priintijd
    printti+N+Pl+Ill:   printtijd
    printti+N+Pl+Loc:   priintijn
    printti+N+Pl+Com:   printijguin
    printti+N+Pl+Abe:   printijttáá

  Noun - leibi:
    leibi+N+Sg+Nom:   leibi
    leibi+N+Sg+Gen:   leeibi
    leibi+N+Sg+Ill:   liäibán
    leibi+N+Sg+Loc:   leeibist
    leibi+N+Sg+Com:   leibijn
    leibi+N+Sg+Abe:   lEibittáá
    leibi+N+Ess:      leibin
    leibi+N+Pl+Nom:   leeibih
    leibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [leeibij, lEibij]
    leibi+N+Pl+Acc:   leeibijd
    leibi+N+Pl+Ill:   leibijd
    leibi+N+Pl+Loc:   leeibijn
    leibi+N+Pl+Com:   lEibijguin
    leibi+N+Pl+Abe:   lEibijttáá

  Noun - seibi:
    seibi+N+Sg+Nom:   seibi
    seibi+N+Sg+Gen:   seeibi
    seibi+N+Sg+Ill:   siäibán
    seibi+N+Sg+Loc:   seeibist
    seibi+N+Sg+Com:   seibijn
    seibi+N+Sg+Abe:   sEibittáá
    seibi+N+Ess:      seibin
    seibi+N+Pl+Nom:   seeibih
    seibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [seeibij, sEibij]
    seibi+N+Pl+Acc:   seeibijd
    seibi+N+Pl+Ill:   seibijd
    seibi+N+Pl+Loc:   seeibijn
    seibi+N+Pl+Com:   sEibijguin
    seibi+N+Pl+Abe:   sEibijttáá

  Noun - veigi:
    veigi+N+Sg+Nom:   veigi
    veigi+N+Sg+Gen:   veeigi
    veigi+N+Sg+Ill:   viäigán
    veigi+N+Sg+Loc:   veeigist
    veigi+N+Sg+Com:   veigijn
    veigi+N+Sg+Abe:   vEigittáá
    veigi+N+Ess:      veigin
    veigi+N+Pl+Nom:   veeigih
    veigi+N+Pl+Gen:  [veeigij, vEigij]
    veigi+N+Pl+Acc:   veeigijd
    veigi+N+Pl+Ill:   veigijd
    veigi+N+Pl+Loc:   veeigijn
    veigi+N+Pl+Com:   vEigijguin
    veigi+N+Pl+Abe:   vEigijttáá

  Noun - sieidi:
    sieidi+N+Sg+Nom:   sieidi
    sieidi+N+Sg+Gen:   sieidi
    sieidi+N+Sg+Ill:   siäidán
    sieidi+N+Sg+Loc:   sieidist
    sieidi+N+Sg+Com:   sieidijn
    sieidi+N+Sg+Abe:   siEidittáá
    sieidi+N+Ess:      sieidin
    sieidi+N+Pl+Nom:   sieidih
    sieidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [sieidij, sieidij]
    sieidi+N+Pl+Acc:   sieidijd
    sieidi+N+Pl+Ill:   sieidijd
    sieidi+N+Pl+Loc:   sieidijn
    sieidi+N+Pl+Com:   siEidijguin
    sieidi+N+Pl+Abe:   siEidijttáá

  Noun - pyeidi:
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Nom:   pyeidi
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Gen:   pyeidi
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Ill:   puáidán
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Loc:   pyeidist
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Com:   puoidijn
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Abe:   pyEidittáá
    pyeidi+N+Ess:      pyeidin
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Nom:   pyeidih
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [puoidij, puoidij]
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Acc:   puoidijd
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Ill:   puoidijd
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Loc:   puoidijn
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Com:   puOidijguin
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Abe:   puOidijttáá

  Noun - kyeimi:
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Nom:   kyeimi
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Gen:   kyeimi
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Ill:   kuáimán
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Loc:   kyeimist
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Com:   kuoimijn
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Abe:   kyEimittáá
    kyeimi+N+Ess:      kyeimin
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Nom:   kyeimih
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuoimij, kuoimij]
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Acc:   kuoimijd
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Ill:   kuoimijd
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Loc:   kuoimijn
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Com:   kuOimijguin
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Abe:   kuOimijttáá

  Noun - syeini:
    syeini+N+Sg+Nom:   syeini
    syeini+N+Sg+Gen:   syeini
    syeini+N+Sg+Ill:   suáinán
    syeini+N+Sg+Loc:   syeinist
    syeini+N+Sg+Com:   suoinijn
    syeini+N+Sg+Abe:   syEinittáá
    syeini+N+Ess:      syeinin
    syeini+N+Pl+Nom:   syeinih
    syeini+N+Pl+Gen:  [suoinij, suoinij]
    syeini+N+Pl+Acc:   suoinijd
    syeini+N+Pl+Ill:   suoinijd
    syeini+N+Pl+Loc:   suoinijn
    syeini+N+Pl+Com:   suOinijguin
    syeini+N+Pl+Abe:   suOinijttáá

  Noun - viini:
    viini+N+Sg+Nom:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Gen:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Ill:   viinin
    viini+N+Sg+Loc:   viinist
    viini+N+Sg+Com:   viinijn
    viini+N+Sg+Abe:   viinittáá
    viini+N+Ess:      viinin
    viini+N+Pl+Nom:   viinih
    viini+N+Pl+Gen:   viinij
    viini+N+Pl+Acc:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Ill:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Loc:   viinijn
    viini+N+Pl+Com:   viinijguin
    viini+N+Pl+Abe:   viinijttáá

  Noun - riisi:
    riisi+N+Sg+Nom:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Gen:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Ill:   riisin
    riisi+N+Sg+Loc:   riisist
    riisi+N+Sg+Com:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Sg+Abe:   riisittáá
    riisi+N+Ess:      riisin
    riisi+N+Pl+Nom:   riisih
    riisi+N+Pl+Gen:   riisij
    riisi+N+Pl+Acc:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Ill:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Loc:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Pl+Com:   riisijguin
    riisi+N+Pl+Abe:   riisijttáá

  Noun - nuáidi:
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Nom:   nuáidi
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Gen:   nuáidi
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Ill:   nuáidán
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Loc:   nuáidist
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Com:   noidijn
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Abe:   nuÁidittáá
    nuáidi+N+Ess:      nuáidin
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Nom:   nuáidih
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [nooidij, nOidij]
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Acc:   nooidijd
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Ill:   noidijd
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Loc:   nooidijn
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Com:   nOidijguin
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Abe:   nOidijttáá

  Noun - käibi:
    käibi+N+Sg+Nom:   käibi
    käibi+N+Sg+Gen:   kääibi
    käibi+N+Sg+Ill:   kááibán
    käibi+N+Sg+Loc:   kääibist
    käibi+N+Sg+Com:   kaibijn
    käibi+N+Sg+Abe:   kÄibittáá
    käibi+N+Ess:      käibin
    käibi+N+Pl+Nom:   kääibih
    käibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [kaaibij, kAibij]
    käibi+N+Pl+Acc:   kaaibijd
    käibi+N+Pl+Ill:   kaibijd
    käibi+N+Pl+Loc:   kaaibijn
    käibi+N+Pl+Com:   kAibijguin
    käibi+N+Pl+Abe:   kAibijttáá

  Noun - äigi:
    äigi+N+Sg+Nom:   äigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Gen:   ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Acc:   ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Ill:   ááigán
    äigi+N+Sg+Loc:   ääigist
    äigi+N+Sg+Com:   aigijn
    äigi+N+Sg+Abe:   äigittáá
    äigi+N+Ess:      äigin
    äigi+N+Par:   äigid
    äigi+N+Pl+Nom:   ääigih
    äigi+N+Pl+Gen:  [aaigij, aigij]
    äigi+N+Pl+Acc:   aaigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Ill:   aigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Loc:   aaigijn
    äigi+N+Pl+Com:   aigijguin
    äigi+N+Pl+Abe:   aigijttáá

  Noun - torvi:
    torvi+N+Sg+Nom:   torvi
    torvi+N+Sg+Gen:   toorvi
    torvi+N+Sg+Ill:   toorvin
    torvi+N+Sg+Loc:   toorvist
    torvi+N+Sg+Com:   torvijn
    torvi+N+Sg+Abe:   torvittáá
    torvi+N+Ess:      torvin
    torvi+N+Pl+Nom:   toorvih
    torvi+N+Pl+Gen:  [toorvij, torvij]
    torvi+N+Pl+Acc:   toorvijd
    torvi+N+Pl+Ill:   torvijd
    torvi+N+Pl+Loc:   toorvijn
    torvi+N+Pl+Com:   torvijguin
    torvi+N+Pl+Abe:   torvijttáá

  Noun - koori:
    koori+N+Sg+Nom:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Gen:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Ill:   koorin
    koori+N+Sg+Loc:   koorist
    koori+N+Sg+Com:   koorijn
    koori+N+Sg+Abe:  [koorittáá, korittáá]
    koori+N+Ess:      koorrin
    koori+N+Pl+Nom:   koorih
    koori+N+Pl+Gen:  [koorij, korij]
    koori+N+Pl+Acc:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Ill:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Loc:   koorijn
    koori+N+Pl+Com:   korijguin
    koori+N+Pl+Abe:   korijttáá

  Noun - purkki:
    purkki+N+Sg+Nom:   purkki
    purkki+N+Sg+Gen:   puurki
    purkki+N+Sg+Ill:   puurkin
    purkki+N+Sg+Loc:   puurkist
    purkki+N+Sg+Com:   purkkijn
    purkki+N+Sg+Abe:   purkittáá
    purkki+N+Ess:      purkkin
    purkki+N+Pl+Nom:   puurkih
    purkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [puurkij, purkij]
    purkki+N+Pl+Acc:   puurkijd
    purkki+N+Pl+Ill:   purkkijd
    purkki+N+Pl+Loc:   puurkijn
    purkki+N+Pl+Com:   purkijguin
    purkki+N+Pl+Abe:   purkijttáá

  Noun - muŋkki:
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Nom:   muŋkki
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Gen:   muuŋki
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Ill:   muuŋkin
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Loc:   muuŋkist
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Com:   muŋkkijn
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Abe:   muŋkittáá
    muŋkki+N+Ess:      muŋkkin
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Nom:   muuŋkih
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [muuŋkij, muŋkij]
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Acc:   muuŋkijd
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Ill:   muŋkkijd
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Loc:   muuŋkijn
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Com:   muŋkijguin
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Abe:   muŋkijttáá

  Noun - uábbi:
    uábbi+N+Sg+Nom:   uábbi
    uábbi+N+Sg+Gen:   uábi
    uábbi+N+Sg+Ill:   uábán
    uábbi+N+Sg+Loc:   uábist
    uábbi+N+Sg+Com:   obbijn
    uábbi+N+Sg+Abe:   uábittáá
    uábbi+N+Ess:      uábbin
    uábbi+N+Pl+Nom:   uábih
    uábbi+N+Pl+Gen:  [oobij, obij]
    uábbi+N+Pl+Acc:   oobijd
    uábbi+N+Pl+Ill:   obbijd
    uábbi+N+Pl+Loc:   oobijn
    uábbi+N+Pl+Com:   obijguin
    uábbi+N+Pl+Abe:   obijttáá

  Noun - cuápci:
    cuápci+N+Sg+Nom:   cuápci
    cuápci+N+Sg+Gen:   cuápci
    cuápci+N+Sg+Ill:   cuápcán
    cuápci+N+Sg+Loc:   cuápcist
    cuápci+N+Sg+Com:   copcijn
    cuápci+N+Sg+Abe:   cuápcittáá
    cuápci+N+Ess:      cuápcin
    cuápci+N+Pl+Nom:   cuápcih
    cuápci+N+Pl+Gen:   copcij
    cuápci+N+Pl+Acc:   coopcijd
    cuápci+N+Pl+Ill:   copcijd
    cuápci+N+Pl+Loc:   coopcijn
    cuápci+N+Pl+Com:   copcijguin
    cuápci+N+Pl+Abe:   copcijttáá

  Noun - äšši:
    äšši+N+Sg+Nom:   äšši
    äšši+N+Sg+Gen:   ääši
    äšši+N+Sg+Ill:   áášán
    äšši+N+Sg+Loc:   ääšist
    äšši+N+Sg+Com:   aššijn
    äšši+N+Sg+Abe:   äšittáá
    äšši+N+Ess:      äššin
    äšši+N+Pl+Nom:   ääših
    äšši+N+Pl+Gen:  [aašij, ašij]
    äšši+N+Pl+Acc:   aašijd
    äšši+N+Pl+Ill:   aššijd
    äšši+N+Pl+Loc:   aašijn
    äšši+N+Pl+Com:   ašijguin
    äšši+N+Pl+Abe:   ašijttáá

  Noun - läbži:
    läbži+N+Sg+Nom:   läbži
    läbži+N+Sg+Gen:   lääbži
    läbži+N+Sg+Ill:   láábžán
    läbži+N+Sg+Loc:   lääbžist
    läbži+N+Sg+Com:   labžijn
    läbži+N+Sg+Abe:   läbžittáá
    läbži+N+Ess:      läbžin
    läbži+N+Pl+Nom:   lääbžih
    läbži+N+Pl+Gen:  [laabžij, labžij]
    läbži+N+Pl+Acc:   laabžijd
    läbži+N+Pl+Ill:   labžijd
    läbži+N+Pl+Loc:   laabžijn
    läbži+N+Pl+Com:   labžijguin
    läbži+N+Pl+Abe:   labžijttáá

  Noun - čääci:
    čääci+N+Sg+Nom:   čääci
    čääci+N+Sg+Gen:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Ill:   čáácán
    čääci+N+Sg+Loc:   čääsist
    čääci+N+Sg+Com:   čassijn
    čääci+N+Sg+Abe:   čäsittáá
    čääci+N+Ess:      čääccin
    čääci+N+Pl+Nom:   čääsih
    čääci+N+Pl+Gen:  [čaasij, časij]
    čääci+N+Pl+Acc:   čaasijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Ill:   čassijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Loc:   čaasijn
    čääci+N+Pl+Com:   časijguin
    čääci+N+Pl+Abe:   časijittáá

  Noun - njäähi:
    njäähi+N+Sg+Nom:   njäähi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Gen:   njäävi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Ill:   njááhán
    njäähi+N+Sg+Loc:   njäävist
    njäähi+N+Sg+Com:   njavvijn
    njäähi+N+Sg+Abe:   njävittáá
    njäähi+N+Ess:      njäähhin
    njäähi+N+Pl+Nom:   njäävih
    njäähi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaavij, njavij]
    njäähi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaavijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Ill:   njavvijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaavijn
    njäähi+N+Pl+Com:   njavijguin
    njäähi+N+Pl+Abe:   njavijttáá
